Hawaii statutes.
§621C-5 Penalty. Any witness granted
immunity hereunder who fails or refuses to testify or produce other information
may be punished by the court for contempt, provided that the witness may be
charged with and convicted of the other offense notwithstanding the fact that
the witness has been punished by the court for contempt. [L 1978, c 212, pt of
§2; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Antitrust proceedings, see §480-23.4.

Refusal to testify, obstruction of justice, see §710-1072.5.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next